Idaho, session 2025, S1179.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-912, Idaho Code, as amended in Section 13 of
Senate Bill No. 1014, as enacted by the First Regular Session of the Sixty-
eighth Idaho Legislature, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
39-907. EXEMPTIONS BECAUSE OF RELIGIOUS BELIEF. The provisions of
this chapter shall not apply to any child whose parent or guardian: objects
thereto on the grounds that it conflicts with the tenets or practices of a
recognized church or religious denomination of which said parent or guardian
is an adherent or member.
(1) Objects on religious or other grounds, including philosophical or
conscientious beliefs; or
(2) Submits a certificate signed by a physician licensed by the state
board of medicine stating that the physical condition of the child is such
that all or any of the requirements of this chapter would endanger the life or
health of the child.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.